Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1327.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "governmental entity" in section 8102 of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Governmental entity." Board of school directors, board of public education, intermediate unit board of directors, area vocational-technical board, any governing board of any agency or authority created by them, and the Commonwealth. The term does 1234567891011121314151617181920 not include an association, nonprofit corporation or other entity that does not perform a governmental function, including an association specified under section 516 of the Public School Code.* * *Section 2. Section 8301(b) of Title 24 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 8301. Mandatory and optional membership in the system and participation in the plan.* * *(b) Prohibited membership.--(1) The school employees categorized in subsection (a)(1) and (2) shall not have the right to elect membership in the system and shall not be eligible to participate in the plan.(2) An entity other than a governmental entity shall be ineligible for membership in the system and an employee of the entity shall be ineligible to participate in the system, except that an active participant employed by the entity on the effective date of this paragraph shall remain an active participant until the active participant's employment with the entity ends. An employee hired by the entity after the effective date of this paragraph shall be ineligible to participate in the system. No later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the board shall identify and remove an ineligible entity and associated employees from the system.* * *(e) Administrative removal fee.--(1) An entity determined to be ineligible for membership 20260SB1327PN1715 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (b)(2) and removed from the system shall not be considered a nonparticipating employer under section 8327.1 (relating to nonparticipating employer withdrawal liability). In lieu of withdrawal liability under section 8327.1, the board shall impose a one-time administrative removal fee on an entity determined to be ineligible for membership under subsection (b)(2) and removed from the system. The administrative removal fee shall not exceed 5% of the amount that would have been the entity's withdrawal liability under section 8327.1(c), determined as of the date of the last actuarial valuation adopted by the board.(2) Within 45 days after the board determines that an entity is ineligible under subsection (b)(2), the board shall provide the entity with written notice of the administrative removal fee, including the basis of calculation and payment terms. The administrative removal fee shall be due within 90 days after the date of the notice and shall be deposited into the State accumulation account to defray costs related to identifying and removing ineligible entities under subsection (b)(2) and associated administrative functions.(3) The board may promulgate regulations necessary to implement this subsection, including procedures for notice, collection, interest on late payment and appeals.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1327PN1715 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324